California, session 20252026, AB2698.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 18.3 (commencing with Section 742.01) is added to Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read: Article 18.3. Youth Court Diversion Grant Program742.01. (a) The Office of Youth and Community Restoration shall establish a grant program to create a youth court diversion pilot program throughout the state. Six one-time grants shall be made, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to two counties in northern California, two counties in the central California, and two counties in southern California.(b) Grant moneys shall be used by counties to establish a three-year pilot program in which local police departments partner with district attorney offices, courts, and local school districts to enact a youth diversion program for first-time misdemeanor juvenile offenders.(c) Juvenile offender may participate in the youth diversion pilot program if they meet all of the following requirements:(1) The offense is the juvenile’s first offense.(2) The juvenile is 17 years of age or younger.(3) The juvenile committed any of the following offenses:(A) Petty theft.(B) Vandalism.(C) Battery. In the case of battery, the victim of the offense shall agree to the juvenile’s participation in the youth diversion program.(D) Possession of drug paraphernalia.(E) Possession of marijuana.(F) Possession of a controlled substance.(d) Juveniles participating in the program shall appear before a jury of their peers that is composed of volunteers from their local high school. Student volunteers shall participate as the prosecutor and defense attorney for the purposes of this pilot program. The student volunteers shall be trained and mentored by an attorney from the district attorney’s office and the public defender’s office. The court shall oversee the proceedings.(e) A county electing to participate in the program shall impose, at a minimum, all of the following requirements for youth diversion proceedings conducted pursuant to this section:(1) No cellular phones are permitted in the courtroom.(2) The last name of the juvenile shall not be disclosed.(3) A student volunteer who knows the juvenile shall be removed from the diversion proceedings.(4) The student jury shall only determine a disposition and shall not make a determination of guilt or innocence.(5) The student jury shall select one of the following dispositions:(A) Community service, with a minimum of 10 hours and a maximum of 40 hours.(B) Youth court jury duty, with a minimum of one time and a maximum of three times.(6) The student jury may impose any of the following in addition to the disposition selected pursuant to paragraph (5):(A) A curfew of 7 p.m., 8 p.m., or 9 p.m.(B) Grade or attendance monitoring by the probation department.(C) Counseling or management services offered through school, health, or other community-based services.(D) Completion of a life plan essay.(E) Completion of an apology letter ranging from one to three pages in length.(f) Participating counties shall annually report the number of juveniles who have completed the diversion program and the recidivism rate of juveniles who participated in the program. In determining the recidivism rate, the participating county shall complete a check for recidivism for each participating juvenile at six months after their completion of the diversion program.742.02. This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.SECTION 1.Section 215 of the Penal Code is amended to read:215.(a)“Carjacking” is the felonious taking of a motor vehicle in the possession of another, from their person or immediate presence, or from the person or immediate presence of a passenger of the motor vehicle, against their will and with the intent to either permanently or temporarily deprive the person in possession of the motor vehicle of their possession, accomplished by means of force or fear.(b)Carjacking is punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for a term of 4, 6, or 10 years.(c)This section shall not be construed to supersede or affect Section 211. A person may be charged with a violation of this section and Section 211. However, no defendant may be punished under this section and Section 211 for the same act which constitutes a violation of both this section and Section 211.